District of Columbia statutes.
29A-201.27

Repealed

Stock book — Failure to make entries or to allow inspections of books.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1288, ch. 854, § 631
Oct. 5, 1985, D.C. Law 6-42, § 470(b), 32 DCR 4450
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(k)(1), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-201.27.
1981 Ed., § 29-227.
1973 Ed., § 29-227.